District of Columbia statutes.
2-1803.01

Jurisdiction to hear appeal.

Except as provided in § 2-1831.16, the District of Columbia Board of Appeals and Review shall entertain and determine appeals timely filed by persons aggrieved by orders issued by hearing examiners pursuant to this chapter or by the Mayor, except that appeals involving infractions of subchapter I of Chapter 6 of Title 6, or the District of Columbia Zoning Regulations shall be entertained and determined by the District of Columbia Board of Zoning Adjustment; appeals involving infractions of Chapter 1 of Title 25, or of any regulation issued under the authority of that chapter shall be entertained and determined by the District of Columbia Alcoholic Beverage Control Board; appeals involving infractions of laws governing occupations and professions or of regulations issued under the authority of those laws shall be entertained and determined by the appropriate occupational or professional board or commission; and appeals involving infractions of Chapter 35 of Title 42, or of any regulation issued under the authority of that chapter shall be entertained and determined by the District of Columbia Rental Housing Commission.

Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 301, 32 DCR 4450
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 2(k), 38 DCR 314
Mar. 6, 2002, D.C. Law 14-76, § 23(b)(1), 48 DCR 11442
This section is referenced in § 2-1803.02 and § 2-1831.16.
1981 Ed., § 6-2721.
D.C. Law 14-76 substituted “Except as provided in § 2-1831.16, the” for “The” in the first sentence.
Title 25, referred to in this section, was amended and enacted by D.C. Law 13-298, effective May 3, 2001. Chapter 1 of former Title 25 embraced all sections in that title. For current provisions of Title 25, see § 25-101 et seq.